Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 677.494, as amended by section  130, chapter 73, Oregon Laws 2024, is
amended to read:
677.494. (1) As used in this section, “telemedicine” means the practice of medicine  and provision
of health care services to a patient by a  physician or physician associate from a distance using
electronic communications, including synchronous technologies to facilitate  an exchange of infor-
mation between a patient and physician or physician associate in  real time or asynchronous tech-
nologies to facilitate an exchange of information between a patient and a physician or physician
associate in other than real time.
(2) A physician licensed under ORS 677.100 to 677.228,  a physician associate licensed under ORS
677.505 to 677.525 or a physician or physician associate licensed  under ORS 677.139 may use tele-
medicine to engage in the practice of medicine and  provide health care services, including the es-
tablishment of a provider-patient relationship, the diagnosis or treatment of a  medical condition or
the prescription of  drugs, to a patient physically located in this state. The physician or physician
associate is not required to be physically  located in this state when engaging in the practice of
medicine and providing health care services through telemedicine.
(3) The practice of medicine using telemedicine occurs where the patient is physically located.
(4)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (2) of this section, a physician licensed under ORS
677.100 to 677.228 or physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to  677.525 may use tele-
medicine to engage in the practice of medicine and provide health care services to  a patient
who is temporarily located out of state if:
(A) The practice of medicine or provision  of health care services is of a temporary, ur-
gent or emergent nature or is to ensure continuity of care to the patient; and
(B) The physician or physician associate has an  established patient-provider relationship
with the patient prior to the time at which the patient is located out of state.
(b) A physician or physician associate  who uses telemedicine as provided under this
subsection is subject to the laws regulating  the practice of medicine in the jurisdiction where
the patient is located at the time the  patient receives health care services provided under
this subsection.
Enrolled House Bill 3727 (HB 3727-A) Page 1
Passed by House April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3727 (HB 3727-A) Page 2